Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 85.3A, as


amended by Section 53, Chapter 228, O.S.L. 2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 85.3A), is amended to read as follows:


Section 85.3A. A. Compliance On and after the effective date


of this act, compliance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Central


Purchasing Act shall not be required of:

Req. No. 2214 Page 1


1. County government;


2. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, the


institutions, centers or other constituent agencies of The Oklahoma


State System of Higher Education;


3. The telecommunications network known as OneNet;


4. The Department of Public Safety gun range;


5. The State Treasurer for the following purchases:


a. services including, but not limited to, legal services


to assist in the administration of the Uniform


Unclaimed Property Act, as provided in Section 668 of


Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


b. software, hardware and associated services to assist


in the administration of funds and securities held by


the state, as provided in Section 71.2 of Title 62 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Statutorily allowed interagency agreements between state


agencies;


7. The Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs, in accordance


with Section 63.22 of Title 72 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


8. The Oklahoma Military Department for the purchases of


heraldry items including, but limited to, medals, badges and other


military accoutrements;


9. A transaction, wholly funded by monies other than state-


derived funds, in which a state agency functions only as a pass-

Req. No. 2214 Page 2


through conduit to fund an acquisition that is required by the


funding source for the benefit of another entity or individuals and


the state agency does not retain ownership of any part of the


acquisition as a result of the transaction; or


10. The Secretary of State when selecting a vendor for


publication of the Oklahoma Statutes in accordance with Section 13


of Title 75 of the Oklahoma Statutes. entities approved by the State


Purchasing Director each fiscal year as authorized in subsection Q


of Section 85.5 of this title.


B. The Legislature shall adopt a joint resolution approving or


disapproving all or any part of a rule associated with the entities


exempted pursuant to subsection A of this section.


C. The State Purchasing Director may form an advisory committee


consisting of representatives from entities exempted from the


provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act. The purpose of


the committee shall be to allow committee members to provide input


into the development of shared state purchasing contracts,


collaboratively participate in the integration of their purchasing


platforms or electronic purchasing catalogs, analyze solutions that


may be used by state government to meet the purchasing needs of the


entities, explore joint purchases of general use items that result


in mutual procurement of quality goods and services at the lowest


reasonable cost and explore flexibility, administrative relief and



Req. No. 2214 Page 3


transformation changes through utilization of procurement


technology.


C. D. At the invitation of the State Purchasing Director,


entities exempted from the provisions of the Oklahoma Central


Purchasing Act shall participate in the advisory committee


referenced in subsection B C of this section.


D. E. The State Purchasing Director may invite representatives


of political subdivisions, and local common education entities to


participate as members of the advisory committee.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 85.5, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 102, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 85.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 85.5. A. Except as otherwise provided in this section,


the State Purchasing Director, under the supervision of the Director


of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, shall have sole


and exclusive authority and responsibility for all acquisitions by


state agencies. In order to carry out the powers and duties of the


Chief Information Officer and the Information Services Division, the


Chief Information Officer shall have sole and exclusive authority


and responsibility for all acquisitions of information and


telecommunications technology, equipment, software, products and


related peripherals and services by state agencies. Public


construction contracts are awarded pursuant to Title 61 of the



Req. No. 2214 Page 4


Oklahoma Statutes and are not subject to the Oklahoma Central


Purchasing Act.


B. Every state agency shall determine its own quantitative


needs for acquisitions and the general class or nature of the


acquisitions. The State Purchasing Director, after consultation


with the requisitioning state agency, shall have authority to


determine the particular brand, model or other specific


classification of each acquisition and to draft or invoke pursuant


to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act specifications establishing


the requirements for all necessary contracts or purchase orders.


C. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall have authority and responsibility to promulgate rules


in connection with provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act


for:


1. The time, manner, authentication, and form of making


requisitions for acquisitions;


2. Inspection, analysis and testing of acquisitions or samples


bidders submit prior to contract award;


3. The form and manner of submission for bids or proposals a


bidder submits and the manner of accepting and opening bids or


proposals;


4. The conditions under which the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services shall require written contracts for


acquisitions, the conditions under which acquisitions may be made on

Req. No. 2214 Page 5


an open account basis, and the conditions and manner of negotiating


such contracts;


5. Obtaining acquisitions produced by state institutions;


6. Conditions under which any of the rules herein authorized


may be waived;


7. The amounts of and deposits on any bond or other surety


required to be submitted with a bid or contract for the furnishing


of acquisitions and the conditions under which such bond or other


surety shall be required;


8. The manner and conditions of delivery, which shall include


the designation of the common carrier of property to be used to


transport acquisitions whenever a common carrier is used, and the


acceptance, or rejection, including check of quantities, of any


acquisitions;


9. The form of any estimate, order or other information


required in connection with an acquisition;


10. State agency acquisitions not exceeding the acquisition


threshold amount requiring competitive bid to ensure


competitiveness, fairness, compliance with the Oklahoma Central


Purchasing Act and Section 3001 et seq. of this title, which relates


to the State Use Committee Advisory Council. The rules shall


include separate provisions based on acquisition amounts as follows:


a. state agencies shall make acquisitions not exceeding


Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), provided

Req. No. 2214 Page 6


the acquisition process is fair and reasonable and is


conducted pursuant to rules authorized pursuant to


this section, and


b. state agencies with certified procurement officers and


internal purchasing procedures found compliant by the


State Purchasing Director may make acquisitions in


excess of the fair and reasonable acquisition


threshold amount provided for in this section and not


exceeding Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($250,000.00), pursuant to rules authorized by this


section;


11. Training by the State Purchasing Director of state agency


procurement officers;


12. Review and audit by the State Purchasing Director of state


agency acquisitions;


13. The conditions for increasing acquisition limits for state


agencies which have had a prior reduction in acquisition limit by


the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services;


14. Use of a state purchase card to make acquisitions;


15. Any other matter or practice which relates to the


responsibilities of the State Purchasing Director;


16. Conditions for determination and authorization of


acquisition threshold amounts of state agencies;



Req. No. 2214 Page 7


17. The form and manner of verification by suppliers that the


supplier is eligible to do business in the State of Oklahoma this


state and has obtained all necessary permits and licenses, pursuant


to applicable provisions of law; and


18. Payment procedure rules for state agencies to adhere to


regarding statewide contracts.


D. The State Purchasing Director shall provide training for


state agency procurement officials, and other procurement staff, and


is authorized to require retraining of such procurement personnel


found not to be in compliance with provisions of the Oklahoma


Central Purchasing Act or associated rules. The training may


include any matters related to state procurement practices. State


agency purchasing officials that demonstrate proficiency shall be


certified as “certified procurement officers” by the State


Purchasing Director and shall be authorized to make acquisitions


pursuant to provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act and


associated rules. The State Purchasing Director may assess a fee to


state agencies for the training that does not exceed each state


agency’s pro rata share of the costs the State Purchasing Director


incurs to provide the training.


E. The State Purchasing Director shall review state agency


acquisitions for the purposes of:


1. Ensuring state agency compliance with provisions of the


Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act;

Req. No. 2214 Page 8


2. Ensuring state agency compliance with rules promulgated by


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services pursuant to the


Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act;


3. Ensuring state agency compliance with provisions of Section


3001 et seq. of this title pertaining to the State Use Committee


Advisory Council;


4. Reporting any acquisition by any state agency found not to


be in compliance with those sections or rules to the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services;


5. A determination by the State Purchasing Director to reduce a


state agency’s acquisition authority amount when the state agency is


found not to be in compliance with the Oklahoma Central Purchasing


Act or associated rules or requirements of the State Purchasing


Director pursuant to this section; and


6. A determination by the State Purchasing Director to increase


a state agency’s acquisition authority amount after the agency cures


deficiencies in connection with a prior reduction in the authority


amount by the State Purchasing Director.


F. Based on written findings and when recommended by the State


Purchasing Director, the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services may:


1. Transmit written findings by the State Purchasing Director


to the State Auditor and Inspector for further investigation,



Req. No. 2214 Page 9


indicating purchasing procedures that do not conform to the Oklahoma


Central Purchasing Act or associated rules; or


2. Transmit to the Attorney General or the State Auditor and


Inspector for further investigation a report made by the State


Purchasing Director that the Director of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services reasonably believes indicates that an action


that constitutes a criminal violation pursuant to the Oklahoma


Central Purchasing Act or other laws has been taken by any state


agency, state agency official, bidder or supplier.


G. 1. Pursuant to the requirements of the Oklahoma Central


Purchasing Act, the State Purchasing Director shall have authority


to enter into any statewide, multistate or multigovernmental


contract. The state entity designated by law, as specified in


Section 1010.3 4002.3b of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall


participate in the purchase of pharmaceuticals available through


such multistate or multigovernmental contracts entered into by the


State Purchasing Director.


2. Whenever it appears advantageous to the state or to any


state agency to purchase or otherwise acquire any acquisition which


may be offered for sale by the United States government or any


agency thereof, the State Purchasing Director may execute a contract


for the acquisition with the federal government or federal agency


and may also utilize contracts awarded by other governmental



Req. No. 2214 Page 10


agencies including, but not limited to, agencies of the United


States of America.


3. The State Purchasing Director may designate, for use by


state agencies, contracts described in this subsection and contracts


awarded on behalf of one or more state agencies.


4. Prior to exercising the authority to cancel a contract, the


State Purchasing Director may authorize renegotiation of an existing


contract with an incumbent supplier for the purposes of obtaining


more favorable terms for the state.


5. The State Purchasing Director shall have the authority to


designate certain contracts for state agencies as statewide


contracts and mandatory statewide contracts. In order to carry out


the powers and duties of the Chief Information Officer and


Information Services Division, the Chief Information Officer shall


have the authority to designate certain information technology and


telecommunication contracts as statewide contracts and mandatory


statewide contracts and may negotiate consolidation contracts,


enterprise agreements and high technology system contracts in lieu


of or in conjunction with competitive bidding procedures to reduce


acquisition cost.


6. The State Purchasing Director may publish such


specifications relating to materials, supplies, equipment and


services to be acquired for the state as may best promote



Req. No. 2214 Page 11


competition and apprise potential suppliers of the type of product


desired.


H. 1. The State Purchasing Director may develop and test new


contracting policies, procedures and innovations that hold potential


for making state procurement more effective and efficient and


identify, and make recommendations to the Legislature of, any


appropriate changes in law. Such development and testing, proof of


concept, pilot project or other similar test shall not be considered


an acquisition subject to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act.


2. The State Purchasing Director is authorized to explore and


investigate cost savings in energy, resource usage and maintenance


contracts and to identify and negotiate contract solutions


including, but not limited to, pilot projects to achieve cost


savings for this state.


I. The State Purchasing Director shall endeavor to satisfy


state agencies in terms of cost, quality and timeliness of the


delivery of acquisitions by using bidders who have a record of


successful past performance, promoting competition, minimizing


administrative operating costs and conducting business with


integrity, fairness and openness.


J. The State Purchasing Director shall undertake the following:


1. The use of electronic commerce pursuant to the Oklahoma


Online Bidding Act for solicitation, notification and other


purchasing processes;

Req. No. 2214 Page 12


2. Monitoring rules promulgated pursuant to the Oklahoma


Central Purchasing Act to ensure that the rules satisfy the


interests of the state, are clear and succinct and encourage


efficiency in purchasing processes;


3. A program to identify suppliers’ performance records;


4. Development of criteria for the use of sealed bid


contracting procedures, negotiated contracting procedures, selection


of types of contracts, postaward post-award administration of


purchase orders and contracts, addendums, termination of contracts


and contract pricing;


5. Continual improvement in the quality of the performance of


the Purchasing Division through training programs, management


seminars, development of benchmarks and key management indicators,


and development of standard provisions, clauses and forms;


6. The State Purchasing Director shall prescribe standardized


contract forms and all other forms or certifications requisite or


deemed necessary by the State Purchasing Director to effectuate the


provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act and associated


rules;


7. Development of programs to improve customer relations


through training, improved communications and appointment of


technical representatives;





Req. No. 2214 Page 13


8. Provide for public two-way communication between procurement


officers and potential bidders who have questions regarding a


request for proposal or invitation to bid; and


9. Determine whether and to what extent information included in


a bid or similar offer is confidential and reject all requests to


disclose the information so designated.


K. The State Purchasing Director may utilize and authorize


state agencies to utilize reverse auctions to obtain acquisitions.


L. Prior to the award of a contract to a supplier, the State


Purchasing Director shall verify, pursuant to applicable provisions


of law, that the supplier is eligible to do business in this state


by confirming registration with the Secretary of State and franchise


tax payment status pursuant to Sections 1203 and 1204 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes. The provisions of this subsection shall be


applicable only if the contract amount is Two Hundred Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($250,000.00) or greater.


M. On an annual basis, the State Purchasing Director shall


transmit to the Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives


and President Pro Tempore of the Senate a report documenting the


savings realized by each agency through the application of best


spend practices including the collection and tracking of spend data,


strategic sourcing programs and implementation of managed and


mandatory statewide contracts and include in the report information


regarding emergency acquisitions.

Req. No. 2214 Page 14


N. The acquisition threshold amount applicable to an


acquisition made pursuant to this act the Oklahoma Central


Purchasing Act or associated rules shall not apply to state agency


purchases;, provided, the State Purchasing Director determines the


agency has subject matter experts on staff having the specialized


expertise to purchase goods or services, and the agency possesses


the necessary legal and procurement staff to procure and monitor the


contracts and; provided further, the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services shall certify that the proposed


purchase does not conflict with consolidated statewide spend


initiatives.


1. Nothing in this subsection shall give an agency authority to


issue statewide, multistate or multigovernmental contracts.


2. Agencies making purchases pursuant to this subsection shall:


a. be responsible for contracts awarded pursuant to this


subsection, which includes, but may not be limited to,


contract management, protest costs, and all costs


connected with or incurred as a result of the


contract, including legal representation,


b. comply with rules and policies of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services, and


c. report contracts issued pursuant to this subsection to


the Purchasing Division of the Office of Management



Req. No. 2214 Page 15


and Enterprise Services, Central Purchasing Division,


on a quarterly basis.


3. Purchases made in accordance with this subsection shall be


made pursuant to rules authorized by this section.


O. The State Purchasing Director, with approval by the Director


of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, is authorized


to make use of any state laboratories for the tests and analyses


authorized in this section wherever practicable and to use private


laboratories or the laboratories of another government agency if it


is impracticable to use state laboratories. The State Purchasing


Director is further authorized to cooperate in test and analysis


programs or agreements with other states or the United States


government and to accept federal funds and funds donated by private


endowments or foundations for the purpose of participation in such


testing programs.


P. The State Purchasing Director shall require all contractors


or subcontractors who have entered into a contract with a public


employer to submit an affidavit that the contractor or subcontractor


is in compliance with the provisions of Section 1313 of Title 25 of


the Oklahoma Statutes. If the State Purchasing Director determines


that a contractor or subcontractor has knowingly submitted a false


affidavit:


1. The contractor or subcontractor shall be liable for an


administrative penalty of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for the

Req. No. 2214 Page 16


first offense, which shall increase by Two Thousand Dollars


($2,000.00) for each subsequent offense; and


2. The public employer or the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services may terminate the contract with the contractor


or subcontractor.


Q. On and after the effective date of this act, the State


Purchasing Director, under the supervision of the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services, shall require all


entities receiving exemptions from the Oklahoma Central Purchasing


Act as provided in Sections 85.3A and 85.12 of this title to submit


evidence to the State Purchasing Director each fiscal year that an


exception reduced costs and increased efficiency for the effected


entity. Upon approval by the State Purchasing Director and the


Legislature, as provided in Sections 85.3A and 85.12 of this title,


entities may receive exemptions from the Oklahoma Central Purchasing


Act.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 85.12, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 339, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 85.12), is amended to read as follows:


Section 85.12. A. The provisions of this section shall not be


construed to affect any law relating to fiscal or accounting


procedure except as they may be directly in conflict herewith; and


all claims, warrants, and bonds shall be examined, inspected, and


approved as now provided by law.

Req. No. 2214 Page 17


B. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the On and


after the effective date of this act, entities approved by the State


Purchasing Director each fiscal year as authorized in subsection Q


of Section 85.5 of this title may make acquisitions specified in


this subsection shall be made in compliance with Section 85.39 of


this title and purchasing card program requirements but are not be


subject to other provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act:


1. Food and other products produced by state institutions and


agencies;


2. The printing or duplication of publications or forms of


whatsoever kind or character by state agencies if the work is


performed upon their own equipment by their own employees. Pursuant


to this paragraph, the state agency may only use equipment owned or


leased by the agency and may only utilize that equipment for


printing services required by the agency in performing duties


imposed upon the agency or functions authorized to be performed by


the agency. Any use of the equipment by the agency pursuant to an


agreement or contract with any other entity resulting in delivery of


intermediate or finished products to the entity purchasing or using


the products shall be subject to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Central Purchasing Act and associated rules;


3. Department of Transportation and Transportation Commission


contractual services or right-of-way acquisitions, contracts awarded


pursuant to bids let by the Transportation Commission for the

Req. No. 2214 Page 18


maintenance or construction of streets, roads, highways, bridges,


underpasses or any other transportation facilities under the control


of the Department of Transportation, equipment or material


acquisitions accruing to the Department of Transportation required


in federal aid contracts and acquisitions for public-service-type


announcements initiated by the Department of Transportation, but not


acquisitions for advertising, public relations or employment


services;


4. Utility services regulated by a state or federal regulatory


commission, municipal ordinance or an Indian Tribal Council;


5. Acquisitions by the University Hospitals Authority. The


Authority shall develop standards for the acquisition of products


and services and may elect to utilize the Purchasing Division. The


standards shall foster economy and short response time and shall


include appropriate safeguards and record-keeping requirements to


ensure appropriate competition and economical and efficient


purchasing;


6. Custom harvesting by the Department of Corrections for the


Department or its institutions;


7. Subject to prior approval of the State Purchasing Director,


acquisitions from private prison suppliers which are subject to the


contracting procedures of Section 561 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


8. Acquisitions by the Oklahoma Municipal Power Authority;

Req. No. 2214 Page 19


9. Acquisitions by the Grand River Dam Authority;


10. Acquisitions by rural water, sewer, gas or solid waste


management districts created pursuant to the Rural Water, Sewer, Gas


and Solid Waste Management Districts Act;


11. Acquisitions by the Oklahoma Ordnance Works Authority, the


Northeast Oklahoma Public Facilities Authority or the Midwestern


Oklahoma Development Authority;


12. Expenditure of monies appropriated to the State Board of


Education for local and state-supported financial support of public


schools, except monies allocated therefrom for the Administrative


and Support Functions of the State Department of Education;


13. Expenditure of monies appropriated to the State Department


of Rehabilitation Services for educational programs or educational


materials for the Oklahoma School for the Blind and the Oklahoma


School for the Deaf;


14. Contracts entered into by the Oklahoma Department of Career


and Technology Education for the development, revision or updating


of vocational curriculum materials, and contracts entered into by


the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education for


training and supportive services that address the needs of new or


expanding industries;


15. Contracts entered into by the Oklahoma Center for the


Advancement of Science and Technology for professional services;



Req. No. 2214 Page 20


16. Contracts entered into by the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce pursuant to the provisions of Section 5066.4 of this title;


17. Acquisitions made by the Oklahoma Historical Society from


monies used to administer the White Hair Memorial;


18. Purchases of pharmaceuticals available through a multistate


or multigovernmental contract if such pharmaceuticals are or have


been on state contract within the last fiscal year, and the terms of


such contract are more favorable to the state or agency than the


terms of a state contract for the same products, as determined by


the State Purchasing Director. The state entity designated by law,


as specified in Section 1010.3 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


shall participate in the purchase of pharmaceuticals available


through such contracts;


19. Contracts for managed health care services entered into by


the state entity designated by law or the Department of Human


Services, as specified in paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section


1010.3 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


20. Acquisitions by a state agency through a General Services


Administration contract or other federal contract if the


acquisitions are not on current statewide contract or the terms of


the federal contract are more favorable to the agency than the terms


of a statewide contract for the same products;





Req. No. 2214 Page 21


21. Acquisitions of clothing for clients of the Department of


Human Services and acquisitions of food for group homes operated by


the Department of Human Services;


22. Acquisitions by the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board;


23. Acquisitions of clothing for juveniles in the custody of


the Office of Juvenile Affairs and acquisitions of food for group


homes operated by the Office of Juvenile Affairs;


24. State contracts for flexible benefits plans pursuant to the


Oklahoma State Employees Benefits Act, Section 1361 et seq. of this


title;


25. Acquisitions by the Oklahoma Department of Securities to


investigate, initiate, or pursue administrative, civil or criminal


proceedings involving potential violations of the acts under the


Department’s jurisdiction and acquisitions by the Oklahoma


Department of Securities for its investor education program;


26. Acquisitions for resale in and through canteens operated


pursuant to Section 537 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes and


canteens established at an institution or facility operated by the


Office of Juvenile Affairs;


27. Acquisitions by the Oklahoma Boll Weevil Eradication


Organization for employment and personnel services, and for


acquiring sprayers, blowers, traps and attractants related to the


eradication of boll weevils in this state or as part of a national


or regional boll weevil eradication program;

Req. No. 2214 Page 22


28. Contracts entered into by the Oklahoma Indigent Defense


System for expert services pursuant to the provisions of subsection


D of Section 1355.4 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


29. Acquisitions by the Oklahoma Correctional Industries and


the Agri-Services programs of the Department of Corrections of raw


materials, component parts and other products, any equipment


excluding vehicles, and any services excluding computer consultant


services used to produce goods or services for resale and for the


production of agricultural products;


30. Contracts entered into by the Department of Human Services


for provision of supported living services to members of the


plaintiff class in Homeward Bound, Inc., et al. v. The Hissom


Memorial Center, et al., Case Number 85-C-437-E, United States


District Court for the Northern District of Oklahoma;


31. Contracts negotiated by the Office of Juvenile Affairs with


designated Youth Services Agencies and the Oklahoma Association of


Youth Services, or another Oklahoma nonprofit corporation whose


membership consists solely of Youth Services Agencies and of whom at


least a majority of Youth Services Agencies are members, pursuant to


the provisions of Section 2-7-306 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes and contracts entered into by the Department of Human


Services pursuant to Section 1-9-110 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes with designated Youth Services Agencies;



Req. No. 2214 Page 23


32. Contracts for annuities for structured settlements provided


for in Section 158 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


33. Subject to subsection E of this section, purchases made


from funds received by local offices administered by the Department


of Human Services or administered by the Office of Juvenile Affairs


for fund-raising activities and donations for the benefit of clients


and potential clients at the local offices where such purchases may


not otherwise be paid for from appropriated funds;


34. Acquisitions by the Oklahoma Historical Society for


restoration of historical sites and museums although the agency may


elect to utilize the Purchasing Division for an acquisition with


supplier and bid selection being the prerogative of the agency,


based on the supplier’s documented qualifications and experience;


and


35. Acquisitions of clothing and food for patients in the care


of the J.D. McCarty Center for Children with Developmental


Disabilities.


C. Pursuant to the terms of a contract the State Purchasing


Director enters into or awards, a state agency, common school,


municipality, rural fire protection district, county officer or any


program contract, purchase, acquisition or expenditure that is not


subject to the provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act,


may, unless acting pursuant to a contract with the state that


specifies otherwise, make use of statewide contracts and the

Req. No. 2214 Page 24


services of the Purchasing Division and the State Purchasing


Director. Any political subdivision or rural fire protection


district may designate the State Purchasing Director as its agent


for any acquisition from a statewide contract or otherwise available


to the state.


D. The State Purchasing Director shall review and audit all the


purchasing procedures of acquisitions listed in subsection B of this


section to ensure that the procedures are being followed. Nothing


in this section shall be construed to authorize bid splitting as


prohibited by the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act.


E. With respect to the Department of Human Services or the


Office of Juvenile Affairs, as applicable, monies received by


fundraising activities or donations from the local office, vending


operations administered by employees of the agency and all other


nonrestricted cash and cash-equivalent items received by employees


of the agency shall be deposited in the agency special account


established for this purpose. The deposits shall be made at local


banking institutions approved by the State Treasurer.


F. With respect to the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation


Department, no exemption provided in this section shall be construed


for the use of leasing or contracting for state-owned restaurants in


Oklahoma state parks. The Department shall not be required to


purchase furniture, fixtures, equipment, and soft goods associated



Req. No. 2214 Page 25


with decor of the state parks, lodges, golf courses, and tourism


information centers from Oklahoma prisons or reformatories.


Additionally, the Department shall not be required to make


purchases pursuant to a statewide contract for materials, supplies,


and services necessary for the efficient and economical operation of


revenue-generating, Department-operated facilities, including those


made to maintain or improve guest perception of quality and service;


provided, that the State Purchasing Director shall review and audit


all uses of the exemptions provided in this subsection biannually


The Legislature shall adopt a joint resolution approving or


disapproving all or any part of a rule associated with the entities


exempted pursuant to subsection B of this section.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2214 MSBB 1/15/2026 9:15:06 AM











Req. No. 2214 Page 26